Washington statutes.
RCW 29B.10.260

General election. (Effective January 1, 2026.)

"General election," for the purposes of RCW 29B.40.020, means the election that results in the election of a person to a state or local office. It does not include a primary.

[ 2024 c 164 s 226.]

NOTES:

Intent—Construction—Rules remain valid—Effective date—2024 c 164: See notes following RCW 29B.10.010.